Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1101
Issues; kinds.

Issues arise on the pleadings where a fact or conclusion of law is maintained by one party and controverted by the other. They are of two kinds: (1) Of law; (2) of fact.

R.S.1867, Code § 277, p. 440;

R.S.1913, § 7840;

C.S.1922, § 8784;

C.S.1929, § 20-1101;

R.S.1943, § 25-1101.

The pleadings before the trial court at the time of decision form the issues of the case. State ex rel. Douglas v. Schroeder, 212 Neb. 562, 324 N.W.2d 391 (1982).